California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
 Sec. 181 et seq.) or the federal Perishable Agricultural Commodities Act, 1930 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 499a et seq.). Within five business days of receipt of a signed and verified complaint, the filing fee, and the denials of federal jurisdiction, the department shall serve the verified complaint on the respondent. Service shall be by certified mail. The department, the secretary, the department’s employees, the department’s agents, the boards and commissions associated with the department, their employees or agents, and the State of California are not parties to the dispute in a proceeding brought under this section.

(2) The complaint filing fee schedule shall be as follows:

(A) For complaints alleging an amount due of less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the filing fee shall be two hundred dollars ($200).

(B) For complaints alleging an amount due of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more but less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the filing fee shall be three hundred dollars ($300).

(C) For complaints alleging an amount due of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or more, the filing fee shall be five hundred dollars ($500).

(b) The respondent served shall answer within 30 calendar days of service. The respondent’s response shall include two copies of all relevant documentation of the transactions referred to in the verified complaint.

(c) Within 30 calendar days of receipt of the answer, the department shall issue to both parties a written factual summary on the basis of the documents that have been filed with the department.

(d) If a settlement is not reached within 30 calendar days after the department’s summary is issued, the department, on request of the claimant or respondent and upon payment of a filing fee of three hundred dollars ($300), shall schedule alternate dispute resolution, to commence within 90 calendar days. The department shall serve both parties with a notice of hearing, which sets out the time, date, street address, room number, telephone number, and name of the hearing officer. Service of the notice of hearing shall be by certified mail.

(e) The alternate dispute resolution shall proceed as follows:

(1) The hearing shall be conducted by hearing officers in accordance with standard procedures promulgated by the American Arbitration Association or other acceptable alternative dispute resolution entities.

(2) The hearing officers shall be familiar with the type of issues presented by those claims, but need not be attorneys.

(3) The sole parties to the proceedings shall be the complainant and the respondent.

(4) The disputes, claims, and interests of the department or the State of California are not within the jurisdiction of the proceedings.

(5) The validity of a regulation of the department or order promulgated pursuant to this code is not within the jurisdiction of the proceedings.

(6) Law and motion matters shall be handled by the assigned hearing officer.

(7) The hearing officer has no authority to enter into settlement
 discussions, except upon stipulation of the parties involved.

(8) The parties may represent themselves in propria persona or may be represented by a licensed attorney at law. A party may not be represented by a representative who is not licensed to practice law.

(9) To the extent of any conflict between Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and this article, this article shall prevail.

(10) The hearing officer may order a review of records or an audit of records by a certified public accountant. The review or audit shall be conducted under generally accepted auditing standards of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants, and upon completion of the review or audit the nature and extent of the review or audit shall be disclosed to the parties
 by the auditor in the audit report. The audit report shall disclose the number of transactions reviewed and the rationale for selecting those transactions. The department shall advance the costs of the audit or review of records, but the hearing officer shall apportion the costs at the conclusion of the hearing. The department shall pursue repayment in accordance with the hearing officer’s apportionment and may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover funds advanced. This subdivision does not require the department to pursue any specific remedy or prohibit the department from accepting a reasonable repayment plan.

(f) The hearing officer shall render a written decision within 60 days of submission of the case for decision. In addition to rendering a written finding as to what is owed by whom on the substantive allegations of the complaint, the hearing officer shall decide whether or not to order the full cost of the
 alternative dispute resolution proceeding, and in what ratio or order the losing party is to pay the costs of the proceeding. For these purposes, the cost of the alternative dispute resolution proceeding does not include the filing fee, the parties’ attorney fees, or expert witness fees. The hearing officer may also award a sanction against a complainant for filing a frivolous complaint or against a respondent for unreasonable delay tactics, bad faith bargaining, or resistance to the claim, of either 10 percent of the amount of the award or a specific amount, up to a maximum of one thousand dollars ($1,000). Any sanction award shall not be deemed to be res judicata or collateral estoppel in any subsequent case in which either the complainant or respondent are charged with filing a frivolous complaint, unreasonable delay tactics, bad faith bargaining, or resistance to the claim. The department may consider the written decision of the hearing officer in determining any related licensing action. The written
 decision of the hearing officer may be introduced as evidence at a court proceeding.

(g) This section does not prohibit the parties to the dispute from settling their dispute before, during, or after the hearing.

(h) This section does not alter, preclude, or condition the exercise, during any stage of the proceedings provided by this chapter, of any other rights to relief a party may have through petition to a court of competent jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, small claims court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 603, Sec. 3.   (SB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

55724.

(a) Every licensee shall prepare and preserve the accounts, records, and memoranda required by this chapter which shall fully and correctly disclose all transactions involved in his business. Licensees shall keep records which are adapted to the particular business that the licensee is conducting and in each case such record shall fully disclose all transactions in the business in sufficient detail as to be readily understood and audited. Minimum records required under this chapter are:

1. A record of cash received.

2. A record of cash disbursed.

3. A general ledger or its equivalent.

4. A record of amounts due California producers.

5. A record of amounts due others.

(b) Every licensee shall prepare and preserve records and memoranda required by this chapter which shall fully and correctly disclose the true ownership and management of such business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------

55725.

The failure or refusal of any licensee to produce and make available to the director any books or records requested pursuant to this article, or otherwise to obstruct the examination or audit, is sufficient ground to suspend or revoke the license issued pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 942, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Investigations and Hearings [55741. - 55745.]

55741.

The department, upon its own motion, may, or upon the verified complaint of any interested party and within 30 days of the filing of that complaint, shall, commence to investigate, examine, or inspect any of the following:

(a) A transaction that involves the failure of the processor to make payment for any farm product within the time that is specified for payment in the contract of sale and purchase between the producer and the processor, in accordance with the terms of the contract or in accordance with this chapter.

(b) A transaction that involves the failure of a processor who contracts to harvest a producer’s crop to fulfill the terms of the contract.

(c) A charge that a processor may be insolvent or in an unsound financial condition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55742.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 55743 or 55744, if the complaint is a bona fide dispute that involves any of the following, the department has no jurisdiction to act upon the complaint if the processor or complainant within 10 days after receiving notice of the filing of the verified complaint has notified the department of his or her election to submit the dispute to alternative dispute resolution procedures in accordance with the provisions of a written contract:

(a) The rejection of any farm product.

(b) The failure or refusal to accept and pay for any farm product that is bought or contracted to be bought from a producer by a processor.

(c) The failure or refusal by the processor to furnish or provide boxes or other containers, or hauling, harvesting, or any other service that is contracted to be done by the processor in connection with the acceptance, harvesting, or other handling of the farm product. 

(d) The terms and conditions of the written contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55743.

The jurisdiction that is otherwise reserved to the department in this chapter, however, is restored for the purposes of this chapter if the authorities responsible for the alternative dispute resolution procedures, without reasonable cause, fail, refuse, or neglect to adjudicate the matter of dispute within 90 days from the date of the notification to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55744.

The department also has jurisdiction over any such complaint or dispute if the processor has failed to perform in accordance with any alternative dispute resolution procedure award that is made in accordance with the terms of the written contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55745.

Any verified complaint filed with the department pursuant to this chapter shall be filed not later than nine months from the date a complete account of sales was due. This period, however, does not include the length of time it takes to secure a written letter of denial from the federal agencies responsible for administering the federal Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 181, et seq.) or the federal Perishable Agricultural Commodities Act, 1930 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 499a et seq.).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 55751 by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Contempt [55811. - 55813.]

55811.

If any person in any proceedings before the director disobeys or resists any lawful order or refuses to respond to a subpoena, or refuses to take the oath or affirmation as a witness or thereafter refuses to be examined, or is guilty of misconduct during a hearing or so near the place of a hearing as to obstruct the proceeding, the director shall certify the facts to the superior court in and for the county where the proceedings are held.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55812.

The court shall thereupon issue an order which directs the person to appear before the court and show cause why he should not be punished as for contempt. The order and a copy of the certified statement shall be served on the person. Thereafter the court shall have jurisdiction of the matter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55813.

The same proceedings shall be had, the same penalties may be imposed, and the person charged may purge himself of the contempt in the same way, as in the case of a person who has committed a contempt in the trial of a civil action before a superior court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Fees [55861. - 55864.]

55861.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this article or in Section 56574, each applicant for a license shall pay to the department a fee in accordance with the schedule in subdivision (b), except that an agent shall pay one hundred dollars ($100) for each license period of the principal.

(b) The amount of the fee due each year from the applicant shall be determined by the annual dollar volume of business based on the value of the farm products that are returned to the grower, as follows:

(1) For a dollar volume of less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), the fee shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(2) For a dollar volume of twenty
 thousand dollars ($20,000) and over, but less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the fee shall be three hundred fifty dollars ($350).

(3) For a dollar volume of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and over, but less than two million dollars ($2,000,000), the fee shall be four hundred fifty dollars ($450).

(4) For a dollar volume of two million dollars ($2,000,000) and over, but less than four million dollars ($4,000,000), the fee shall be five hundred fifty dollars ($550).

(5) For a dollar volume of four million dollars ($4,000,000) and over, the fee shall be six hundred fifty dollars ($650).

(c) The department may reevaluate the fee structure based on operating costs. The fees shall adequately cover the costs to fully administer and operate the
 program in an effective and efficient manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 603, Sec. 4.   (SB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

55861.5.

The fees provided by Section 55861 are maximum fees. The secretary may fix those fees at a lesser amount, and may adjust those fees from time to time, whenever the secretary finds that the funds needed to administer this chapter must be adjusted for the sustainability of the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 603, Sec. 5.   (SB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

55862.

(a) (1) If any processor does not apply for the renewal of a preexisting license on or before the date of expiration of the license, a penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25) shall be added to the fee provided for under Section 55861 or 55861.5. That penalty shall be paid within 30 days immediately following the license expiration date . Payment of the penalty shall entitle the applicant to 60 days from the date of the penalty payment to complete the application. If the application is not completed within that time, the application shall be denied and all fees retained by the department.

(2) If the penalty described in paragraph (1) is not paid within the 30-day period, any application for renewal of a preexisting license shall be treated as a new application.

(b) A new applicant shall have 60 days from the date of filing the application form and payment of the fee to complete the application. After the 60-day period has elapsed, if the application remains incomplete, the application may be denied and the application fee may be retained by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 198, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

55862.7.

(a) If any person is found to be operating a business without the license required by Section 55521, or failed to pay a fee in accordance with the schedule in subdivision (b) of Section 55861, that person shall pay to the secretary double the amount of the license fee due pursuant to this chapter.

(b) In addition to subdivision (a), if any person is found to be operating a business within the past five years without a license required by Section 55521, or failed to pay the fees in accordance with the schedule in subdivision (b) of Section 55861, that person shall pay to the secretary an amount equal to three times
 that portion of the fees that were not paid for the last five years the business has operated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 465, Sec. 4.   (AB 907)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

55863.

Any person that has applied for and obtained a license pursuant to this chapter may apply for and secure a license under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 56101) by filing an application which is accompanied by a fee determined by the dollar volume of business based on the value of the farm products that is returned to the grower or licensee, as follows:

(a) For a dollar volume of less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the fee shall be fifty dollars ($50).

(b) For a dollar volume of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and over, but less than two million dollars ($2,000,000), the fee shall be one hundred forty-five dollars ($145).

(c) For a dollar volume of two million dollars ($2,000,000) and over, the fee shall be two hundred dollars ($200).

This license shall be known as a “conjunctive license.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   Effective August 21, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

55863.5.

Any person who has applied for and obtained a license as agent, in the manner and upon the payment of the fee which is set forth in Section 55861, whose principal has applied for and obtained a conjunctive dealer's, commission merchant's, broker's, or cash buyer’s license, as the case may be, shall be deemed to be licensed to represent his principal under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 56101) of this division, and no other fee shall be required of such agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 667.)
-------------------------------------------

55864.

All fees which are collected pursuant to this chapter shall be paid into the State Treasury monthly and shall be credited to the Department of Agriculture Fund and, except as otherwise provided in Section 55433, shall be expended in carrying out this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Violations [55872. - 55882.]

55872.

It is a violation of this chapter if the applicant, or licensee, has failed or refused to pay for any farm product at the time and in the manner which is specified in the contract with the producer, or as is otherwise provided in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55873.

It is a violation of this chapter if the applicant, or licensee, has rejected, without reasonable cause, or has refused to accept, without reasonable cause, any farm product which is bought or contracted to be bought from a producer by such applicant or licensee, or failed or refused, without reasonable cause, to furnish or provide boxes or other containers, or hauling, harvesting, or any other service which is contracted to be done by the licensee in connection with the acceptance, harvesting, or other handling of such farm product which is bought or handled or contracted to be bought or handled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55874.

It is a violation of this chapter if the licensee has knowingly employed an agent without causing the agent to comply with the licensing requirements of this chapter which are applicable to agents.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55875.

It is a violation of this chapter if the licensee has failed or refused, upon demand, to permit the director or his agents to make the investigations, examinations, or audits as provided in this chapter, or that the licensee has removed or sequestered any books, records, or papers necessary to any such investigations, examinations, or audits, or has otherwise obstructed them.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55876.

It is a violation of this chapter if the applicant, or licensee, has otherwise violated any provision of this chapter or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 56101) of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55877.

It is a violation of this chapter if the licensee licensed as a cash buying processor has bought or otherwise taken title to, or possession of, any farm product from the producer of the farm product, except by cash payment to the producer, at the time of obtaining such possession or control, of the full agreed price.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

55878.

The failure or refusal of a processor to make payment for any farm product within the time which is specified for such payment in the contract of sale and purchase between the producer and the processor, and in accordance with the terms of the contract, is a violation of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55879.

It is a violation of this chapter if the applicant or licensee has failed or refused to render a true and correct account of sales or make settlement thereon or to pay for farm products received on consignment within the time and in the manner required by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

55880.

It is a violation of this chapter if the licensee or applicant has failed or refused to file with the director a schedule of his charges for services in connection with any farm product which is handled on account of, or as agent for another. Any services rendered for which charges are made, if not filed with the director, shall be charged at cost, if not covered by a written contract. Cost-supporting data shall be available for verification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------

55881.

Under a contract for the purchase or handling of any farm product, any delinquent payment of money under this chapter shall also include a late charge of 5 percent per month of the unpaid balance calculated on a daily basis for the period of the delinquency for the first month and an additional 1 percent per month of the unpaid balance calculated on a daily basis for the remaining period of the delinquency. Any such late charge shall be payable to the person from whom the farm product was purchased, unless the person waives, in writing, his right to such payment. Such waiver shall be valid and effective only when given after a delinquency has occurred.

This section does not affect the time of payment provided for in this chapter or in any contract for the purchase or handling of any farm product.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 400.)
-------------------------------------------

55882.

It is a violation of this chapter if a licensee fails, neglects, or refuses to collect or remit any assessments that have been levied in accordance with the assessment provisions of Article 10 (commencing with Section 58921) of Chapter 1 or Article 12 (commencing with Section 59941) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 21, or Article 8 (commencing with Section 64691) of Chapter 2, Chapter 3, (commencing with Section 65500), Article 5 (commencing with Section 66621) of Chapter 4, Article 6 (commencing with Section 67101) of Chapter 5, Article 6 (commencing with Section 68101) of Chapter 6, Article 6 (commencing with Section 69081) of Chapter 7, Chapter 9.5 (commencing with Section 71000), Article 6 (commencing with Section 72101) of Chapter 10, Chapter 12.6 (commencing with Section 74701), Chapter 12.7 (commencing with Section 74801), Article 6 (commencing with Section 75131) of Chapter 13, Article 8 (commencing with Section 75631) of Chapter 13.5, Article 6 (commencing with Section 76141) of Chapter 14, Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 76201), Chapter 16.5 (commencing with Section 77001), Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 77201), Chapter 17.5 (commencing with Section 77401), Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 77701), Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 77901), Article 6 (commencing with Section 78285) of Chapter 21, or Article 6 (commencing with Section 78700) of Chapter 24, of Part 2 of Division 22.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 768, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18. Criminal Penalties [55901. - 55906.]

55901.

(a) Except as specified in Section 55902, any misdemeanor which is prescribed by this article is punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) or more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) For a violation of the offense described in subdivision (a), the department may recover investigative costs, excluding attorneys’ fees and administrative overhead, for those charges where there has been a conviction in a court of law, or a court-supervised settlement has been reached. Nothing in this section allows the department to recover investigative costs for an administrative licensing action or any action that has not been filed in a court of law.

(c) Any person or entity responsible for investigative costs under this section shall be allowed to audit the department’s investigative costs. The audit must be performed by a third-party certified public accountant and paid for by the person or entity requesting the audit. The department shall promulgate regulations to implement this subdivision by June 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 768, Sec. 4.5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

55902.

It is a misdemeanor for any person subject to this chapter to act as a processor or agent without a license, and is punishable by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 942, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

55902.2.

It is a misdemeanor for any person subject to this chapter to pay license fees in an amount less than that amount established under subdivision (b) of Section 55861. Any person who pays less than the amount established under subdivision (b) of Section 55861 for two or more consecutive years shall pay to the director treble the amount of the license fees due pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 733, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

55902.5.

It is a misdemeanor for any person licensed as a cash buying processor to buy or otherwise take title to, or possession of, any farm product from a producer of the product, except by cash payment of the full agreed price to the producer at the time of obtaining possession or control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 942, Sec. 9.5.)
-------------------------------------------

55903.

It is a misdemeanor for any person that is subject to this chapter to willfully refuse to pay for any farm product which such person purchases within 20 days after the date of the delivery of such product by the producer if he has the ability to pay and demand for payment is made, except in the case of a bona fide dispute, unless the time of payment is otherwise agreed upon in writing, or the payment of the purchase price is secured other than by a lien.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55904.

It is a misdemeanor for any person that is subject to this chapter to falsely deny the amount, or the validity, of any producer’s claim, or that it is due, with the intent to secure for himself, his employer or other person, any discount upon such indebtedness, or with the intent to annoy, harass, oppress, hinder, delay, or defraud the person to whom such indebtedness is due.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55905.

It is a misdemeanor for any person that is subject to this chapter to sell, hypothecate, sequester with intent to defraud any producer, or in any manner place or attempt to place any product upon which liens in favor of any producer have attached, beyond the control, reach, or recovery of any such claimant.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55906.

It is a misdemeanor for any person that is subject to this chapter to fail to comply with this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 19. Civil Remedies and Penalties [55921. - 55922.]

55921.

The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation or the threatened violation of any provision of this chapter or of any order which is made pursuant to this chapter in the superior court in the county in which such violation occurs or is about to occur.

There may be enjoined in one proceeding any number of defendants alleged to be violating the same provisions or orders, although their properties, interests, residences, or places of business may be in several counties and the violations separate and distinct. Any proceeding which is brought pursuant to this section shall be governed in all other respects by the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525), Title 7, Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55922.

(a) Any person that violates any provision of this chapter is liable civilly in the sum of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation, to be recovered in an action by the secretary in any court of competent jurisdiction. All sums which are recovered under this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(b) The department may recover investigative costs, excluding attorney’s fees and administrative overhead, for those charges where there has been a conviction in a court of law, or a court-supervised
 settlement has been reached. Nothing in this section allows the department to recover investigative costs for an administrative licensing action or any action that has not been filed in a court of law.

(c) Any person or entity responsible for investigative costs under this section shall be allowed to audit the department’s investigative costs. The audit shall be performed by a third-party certified public accountant and paid for by the person or entity requesting the audit. The department shall promulgate regulations to implement this subdivision by June 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 465, Sec. 5.   (AB 907)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Produce Dealers [56101. - 56652.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [56101. - 56110.]

56101.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56102.

“Agent” means any person who on behalf of any licensee receives on consignment, contracts for, or solicits for sale on commission, any farm product from a licensee or producer of such product, or who negotiates the consignment or purchase of any farm product on behalf of any licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

56103.

“Broker” means any person that negotiates the purchase or sale of any farm product. A broker may not, however, handle either the farm product which is involved or the proceeds of a sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 915.)
-------------------------------------------

56103.5.

“Cash” means coin or currency of the United States, and does not include a check or money order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

56104.

“Cash buyer” means any person who obtains title to, possession or control of, or buys or agrees to buy any farm product from a licensee or a producer by paying to the seller the full agreed price in cash at the time of obtaining possession or control, or at the time of contracting for title to, or possession or control of any farm product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

56105.

“Commission merchant” means any person, as follows:

(a) Who receives on consignment or solicits any farm product from a licensee or producer of the product.

(b) Who accepts any farm product in trust from a licensee or the producer of the product for purposes of sale.

(c) Who sells any farm product on commission.

(d) Who handles any farm product in any way for the account of or as an agent of the consignor of the product. Any person who accepts a farm product from a licensee or the producer of such product for the purpose of sale or resale is a commission merchant, unless the person has bought, or agreed to buy, the farm product by a contract which designates the price to be paid to the seller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

56106.

“Consignor” includes any person that ships or delivers to any commission merchant or dealer any farm product for handling, sale, or resale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56107.

“Dealer” means any person who obtains title to, or possession, control, or delivery of, any farm product from a licensee or producer at a designated price for the purpose of resale, or who buys or agrees to buy any farm product from a licensee or the producer of the farm product at a designated price.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

56108.

“Established place of business” means any permanent warehouse, building, or structure which is owned in fee or leased, at which the owner or lessee carries on a legitimate permanent business in good faith, and at which a stock of any farm product is stored or kept in quantities which are usually carried and reasonably adequate to meet the requirements of the business. It does not mean any tent, temporary stand, or other temporary structure, or permanent structure which is occupied pursuant to a temporary arrangement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56109.

“Farm product” includes every agricultural, horticultural, viticultural, and vegetable product of the soil, poultry and poultry products, livestock products and livestock not for immediate slaughter, bees and apiary products, hay, dried beans, honey, and cut flowers. It does not, however, include any timber or timber product, flower or agricultural or vegetable seed, any milk product that is subject to the licensing and bonding provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 61801) of Part 3 of Division 21, any aquacultural product, or cattle sold to any person who is bonded under the federal Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 181 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 145.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

56109.5.

“Licensee” means any person licensed under this chapter as a broker, cash buyer, commission merchant, or dealer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

56110.

“Producer” means any person that is engaged in the business of growing or producing any farm product.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [56131. - 56136.]

56131.

The marketing of agricultural commodities within this state is hereby declared to be affected with a public interest. The provisions of this chapter are enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56132.

The director may publish in pamphlet form as often as he thinks necessary a list of all licensees and agents that are licensed pursuant to this chapter together with all necessary regulations which concern the enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 915.)
-------------------------------------------

56133.

(a) Any money in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund that was derived pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 55401) may be expended for the administration and enforcement of these chapters and Chapter 7.2 (commencing with Section 56701), notwithstanding any other law that limits the expenditure of any such money to the specific purposes or to the administration or enforcement of each of the chapters separately.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) and Section 221, only moneys derived from the fees collected pursuant to Sections 55861, 55863, 56571, and 56574 may be used for purposes of Chapter 7.2 (commencing with Section 56701).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 603, Sec. 6.   (SB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

56133.5.

(a) Except pursuant to an exemption granted by the department, no person licensed under this chapter shall employ any person as an agent, or who previously was an agent, who meets any of the following criteria:

(1) Whose license has been revoked or is currently suspended.

(2) Who has committed any one flagrant or repeated violations of this chapter or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 55401).

(3) Who failed to pay a producer’s claims for which the person, or, where the person controlled the decision to pay, the person’s employer, was liable, and which arose out of the conduct of a business licensed or required to be licensed under this chapter or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 55401).

(4) Who has been convicted of a crime that includes as one of its elements the financial victimization of another person.
